Vermont, session 2025-2026, S28.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 1 V.S.A. § 150 is amended to read:
§ 150. LEGALLY PROTECTED HEALTH CARE ACTIVITY
* * *
(b)(1) “Legally protected health care activity” means:
* * *
(4) The protections applicable to persons who engage in “legally
protected health care activity” shall also apply to a person who has previously
undertaken one or more acts or omissions while in another U.S. jurisdiction to
aid or encourage, or attempt to aid or encourage, any person in the exercise and
enjoyment, or attempted exercise and enjoyment, of rights to reproductive
health care services or gender-affirming health care services that would have
been protected by this State if they had been undertaken in this State, provided
that the acts or omissions were permissible under the laws of the jurisdiction in
which the person was located at the time they were undertaken.
* * *
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 317(c) is amended to read:
(c) The following public records are exempt from public inspection and
copying:
* * *
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 2 of 25
2025
(44) Records held by the Office of Professional Regulation, Board of
Medical Practice, or another public agency that issues one or more licenses,
certificates, or registrations to engage in a State-regulated profession or
occupation if the records contain the telephone number, email address,
physical address, or mailing address, or a combination of these, of an
individual who has applied for or has been granted a license, certificate, or
registration to practice a profession or occupation in this State, except that the
public agency shall disclose any address that the individual has designated as a
public address in the record.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 129a is amended to read:
§ 129a. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
(a) In addition to any other provision of law, the following conduct by a
licensee constitutes unprofessional conduct. When that conduct is by an
applicant or person who later becomes an applicant, it may constitute grounds
for denial of a license or other disciplinary action. Any one of the following
items or any combination of items, whether the conduct at issue was
committed within or outside the State, shall constitute unprofessional conduct:
(1) Fraudulent or deceptive procurement or use of a license.
(2) Advertising, including advertising about health care services, that is
intended or has a tendency to deceive or mislead.
* * *
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 3 of 25
2025
(6) Delegating professional responsibilities, including the delivery of
health care services, to a person whom the licensed professional knows, or has
reason to know, is not qualified by training, experience, education, or licensing
credentials to perform them, or knowingly providing professional supervision
or serving as a preceptor to a person who has not been licensed or registered as
required by the laws of that person’s profession.
* * *
(21) Permitting one’s name or license to be used by a person, group, or
corporation when not actually in charge of or responsible for, or actively
overseeing the professional services provided.
* * *
(f)(1) Health care providers. Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section
or any other law to the contrary, no health care provider who is certified,
registered, or licensed in Vermont shall be subject to professional disciplinary
action by a board or the Director, nor shall a board or the Director take adverse
action on an application for certification, registration, or licensure of a
qualified health care provider, based solely on:
* * *
(2) Definitions. As used in this subsection:
* * *
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 4 of 25
2025
(B) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a physical or mental health condition,
including counseling, procedures, products, devices, and medications.
* * *
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 11 is amended to read:
Subchapter 11. Pregnancy Services Centers Health Care Services
§ 2491. FINDINGS; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Centers that seek to counsel clients against abortion, often referred to
as crisis pregnancy centers or limited-services pregnancy centers, have become
common across the country, including in Vermont. Accurate information
about the services that a limited-services pregnancy center performs, in
addition to forthright acknowledgement of its limitations, is essential to enable
individuals in this State to make informed decisions about their care. This
includes individuals being informed of whether they are receiving services
from a licensed and qualified health care provider at a limited-services
pregnancy center, as this allows individuals to determine if they need to seek
medical care elsewhere in order to continue or terminate a pregnancy.
(2) Although some limited-services pregnancy centers openly
acknowledge in their advertising, on their websites, and at their facilities that
they neither provide abortions nor refer clients to other providers of abortion
services, others provide confusing and misleading information to pregnant
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 5 of 25
2025
individuals contemplating abortion by leading those individuals to believe that
their facilities offer abortion services and unbiased counseling. Some limited-
services pregnancy centers have promoted patently false or biased medical
claims about abortion, pregnancy, contraception, and reproductive health care
providers.
(3) False and misleading advertising by centers that do not offer or refer
clients for abortion is of special concern to the State because of the time-
sensitive and constitutionally protected nature of the decision to continue or
terminate a pregnancy. When a pregnant individual is misled into believing
that a center offers services that it does not in fact offer or receives false or
misleading information regarding health care options, the individual loses time
crucial to the decision whether to terminate a pregnancy and may lose the
option to choose a particular method or to terminate a pregnancy at all.
(4) Telling the truth is how trained health care providers demonstrate
respect for patients, foster trust, promote self-determination, and cultivate an
environment where best practices in shared decision-making can flourish.
Without veracity in information and communication, it is difficult for
individuals to make informed, voluntary choices that are essential to one’s
sense of personal agency and autonomy.
(5)(2) Advertising strategies and educational information about health
care options that lack transparency, use misleading or ambiguous terminology,
misrepresent or obfuscate services provided, or provide factually inaccurate
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 6 of 25
2025
information are a form of manipulation that disrespects individuals,
undermines trust, broadens health disparity, and can result in patient harm.
(b) Intent.
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that the public is
provided with accurate, factual information about the types of health care
services that are available to pregnant individuals in this State. The General
Assembly respects the constitutionally protected right of each individual to
personal reproductive autonomy, which includes the right to receive clear,
honest, and nonmisleading information about the individual’s options and to
make informed, voluntary choices after considering all relevant information.
(2) The General Assembly respects the right of limited-services
pregnancy centers to counsel individuals against abortion, and nothing in this
subchapter should be construed to regulate, limit, or curtail such advocacy.
§ 2492. DEFINITIONS DEFINITION
As used in this subchapter:,
(1) “Abortion” means any medical treatment intended to induce the
termination of, or to terminate, a clinically diagnosable pregnancy except for
the purpose of producing a live birth.
(2) “Client” means an individual who is inquiring about or seeking
services at a pregnancy services center.
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 7 of 25
2025
(3) “Emergency contraception” means any drug approved by the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration as a contraceptive method for use after sexual
intercourse, whether provided over the counter or by prescription.
(4) “Health information” means any oral or written information in any
form or medium that relates to health insurance or the past, present, or future
physical or mental health or condition of a client.
(5) “Limited-services pregnancy center” means a pregnancy services
center that does not directly provide, or provide referrals to clients for,
abortions or emergency contraception.
(6) “Pregnancy services center” means a facility, including a mobile
facility, where the primary purpose is to provide services to individuals who
are or may be pregnant and that either offers obstetric ultrasounds, obstetric
sonograms, or prenatal care to pregnant individuals or has the appearance of a
medical facility. A pregnancy services center has the appearance of a medical
facility if two or more of the following factors are present:
(A) The center offers pregnancy testing or pregnancy diagnosis, or
both.
(B) The center has staff or volunteers who wear medical attire or
uniforms.
(C) The center contains one or more examination tables.
(D) The center contains a private or semiprivate room or area
containing medical supplies or medical instruments.
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 8 of 25
2025
(E) The center has staff or volunteers who collect health information
from clients.
(F) The center is located on the same premises as a State-licensed
medical facility or provider or shares facility space with a State-licensed
medical provider.
(7) “Premises” means land and improvements or appurtenances or any
part thereof “health care services” means all supplies, care, and services of a
medical, dental, behavioral health, mental health, substance use disorder
treatment, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, preventative,
rehabilitative, or supportive nature, including medication.
§ 2493. UNFAIR AND DECEPTIVE ACT
(a) It is an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce and a
violation of section 2453 of this title for any limited-services pregnancy center
person to disseminate or cause to be disseminated to the public any advertising
about the health care services or proposed services performed at that center in
this State that is untrue or clearly designed to mislead the public about the
nature of the services provided. Advertising includes representations made
directly to consumers; marketing practices; communication in any print
medium, such as newspapers, magazines, mailers, or handouts; and any
broadcast medium, such as television or radio, telephone marketing, or
advertising over the Internet internet such as through websites and, web ads
advertisements, and social media. For purposes of this chapter, advertising or
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 9 of 25
2025
the provision of services by a limited-services pregnancy center about health
care services is an act in commerce.
(b) Health care providers certified, registered, or licensed under Title 26 of
the Vermont Statutes Annotated who are employed by, contracted to provide
services for or on behalf of, or volunteer to provide services at a limited-
services pregnancy center shall be responsible for conducting and providing
health care services, information, and counseling at the center. The failure of a
health care professional certified, registered, or licensed under Title 26 of the
Vermont Statutes Annotated to conduct or to ensure that health care services,
information, and counseling at the limited-services pregnancy services center
are conducted in accordance with State law and professional standards of
practice may constitute unprofessional conduct under 3 V.S.A. § 129a and 26
V.S.A. § 1354. [Repealed.]
(c) The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct
civil investigations, and bring civil actions with respect to violations of
subsection (a) of this section as provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.
Sec. 5. 12 V.S.A. § 7306 is amended to read:
§ 7306. NONCOOPERATION
(a) No public agency or employee, appointee, officer or official, or any
other person individual acting on behalf of a public agency may knowingly
provide any information or expend or use time, money, facilities, property,
equipment, personnel, or other resources in furtherance of any interstate or
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 10 of 25
2025
federal investigation or proceeding seeking to impose civil or criminal liability
upon a person an individual or entity for:
(1) the provision, seeking or receipt of, or inquiring about legally
protected health care activity that is legal in this State; or
(2) assisting any person individual or entity providing, seeking,
receiving, or responding to an inquiry about legally protected health care
activity that is legal in this State.
(b) This section shall not apply to:
(1) any investigation or proceeding where the conduct subject to
potential liability under the investigation or proceeding would be subject to
liability under the laws of this State if committed in this State;
(2) any action taken by the Judicial Branch in judicial proceedings order
issued by a Vermont State court or a federal court; or
(3) a public agency or employee, appointee, officer or official, or any
other individual acting on behalf of a public agency who, in the course of
normal business, is responding to a warrant or extradition demand on the good
faith belief that the warrant or demand is valid in this State.
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 1881 is amended to read:
§ 1881. DISCLOSURE OF PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION
PROHIBITED
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 11 of 25
2025
(1) “Business associate” has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R.
§ 160.103.
(2) “Covered entity” has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R. § 160.103.
(3) “Legally protected health care activity” has the same meaning as in 1
V.S.A. § 150.
(4) “Protected health information” has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R.
§ 160.103.
(5) “Telehealth” has the same meaning as in 26 V.S.A. § 3052.
(b) A covered entity or business associate shall not disclose protected
health information unless the disclosure is permitted under the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA).
(c)(1) In Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (b) of this section to
the contrary, in order to protect patients and providers who engage in legally
protected health care activity and except as set forth in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, a covered entity or business associate shall not disclose protected
health information that is identifiable or susceptible to reidentification and is
related to a legally protected health care activity:
(A) to any government entity other than the State of Vermont or its
political subdivisions or instrumentalities if the covered entity or business
associate has reason to believe that the information will be used:
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 12 of 25
2025
(i) to conduct a criminal, civil, administrative, or professional
disciplinary investigation into any individual for the mere act of seeking,
obtaining, providing, or facilitating a legally protected health care activity;
(ii) to impose criminal, civil, or administrative liability or
professional disciplinary action on any individual for the mere act of seeking,
obtaining, providing, or facilitating a legally protected health care activity; or
(iii) to identify any individual for any of the activities described in
subdivision (i) or (ii) of this subdivision (A); or
(B) for use in a civil or criminal action; a proceeding preliminary to a
civil or criminal action; or a probate, legislative, or administrative proceeding
unless.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (1) of this subsection
to the contrary, a covered entity or business associate may disclose protected
health information that is identifiable or susceptible to reidentification and is
related to a legally protected health care activity if the disclosure meets one or
more of the following conditions:
(1)(A) The disclosure is authorized by the patient or the patient’s
conservator, guardian, or other authorized legal representative.
(2) The disclosure is specifically required by federal law, Vermont law,
or rules adopted by the Vermont Supreme Court.
(3)(B) The disclosure is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction
pursuant to federal law, Vermont law, or rules adopted by the Vermont
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 13 of 25
2025
Supreme Court. An A State court order compelling disclosure under this
subdivision (B) shall include the court’s determination that good cause exists
to require disclosure of the information related to the information will not be
used to impose criminal, civil, or administrative liability or professional
disciplinary action on any individual based solely on the fact that the person
sought, obtained, provided, or facilitated a legally protected health care
activity.
(4)(C) The disclosure is to be made to a person business associate
designated by the covered entity or the covered entity’s business associate and
will be used solely in the defense of the covered entity or the covered entity’s
business associate against a claim that has been made, or there is a reasonable
belief will be made, against the covered entity or the covered entity’s business
associate in a civil or criminal action; a proceeding preliminary to a civil or
criminal action; or a probate, legislative, or administrative proceeding.
(5)(D) The disclosure is to Vermont’s Board of Medical Practice or
Office of Professional Regulation, as applicable, in connection with a bona fide
investigation in Vermont of a licensed, certified, or registered health care
provider or a bona fide investigation of whether an individual who is not
licensed, certified, or registered to practice a health care profession in Vermont
engaged in unauthorized practice in this State, whether in person or through
telehealth.
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 14 of 25
2025
(6)(E) The disclosure is to the Vermont Department of Health or the
Vermont Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, or both,
in connection with a bona fide investigation of a licensed health care facility in
Vermont.
(F) Subject to the limitations set forth in 12 V.S.A. § 7306, the
disclosure is required in the ordinary course of business of Vermont’s
Medicaid program.
(d) A covered entity or business associate shall not be subject to any civil,
criminal, or administrative liability or professional disciplinary action for
refusing to disclose protected health information that is identifiable or
susceptible to reidentification and is related to a legally protected health care
activity, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
Sec. 7. 18 V.S.A. § 4999 is amended to read:
§ 4999. DEFINITIONS
As used in this part:
* * *
(2) “Licensed health care professional,” as used in 18 V.S.A. chapter
107, means a physician, a physician assistant, a naturopathic physician, or an
advanced practice registered nurse. As used in chapter 107 of this part only,
the term also includes a naturopathic physician.
* * *
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 15 of 25
2025
Sec. 8. 18 V.S.A. § 5200 is amended to read:
§ 5200. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4) “Licensed health care professional” means a physician, a physician
assistant, a naturopathic physician, or an advanced practice registered nurse.
(5) “Natural organic reduction” has the same meaning as in section 5302
of this title.
Sec. 9. 18 V.S.A. § 5222 is amended to read:
§ 5222. REPORTS
(a)(1) The following fetal deaths shall be reported by the hospital,
physician licensed health care professional, or funeral director directly to the
Commissioner within seven days after delivery on forms prescribed by the
Department:
(1)(A) All fetal deaths of 20 or more weeks of gestation or, if gestational
age is unknown, of 400 or more grams, 15 or more ounces, fetal weight shall
be reported.
(2)(B) All therapeutic or induced abortions, as legally authorized to be
performed, of any length gestation or weight shall be reported.
(3)(2) Spontaneous abortions and ectopic pregnancies of less than 20
weeks gestation are not required to be reported.
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 16 of 25
2025
(b) The physician licensed health care professional who treats a woman
patient as a result of a miscarriage or abortion shall report the fetal death if it is
not known to be previously reported under subsection (a) of this section. If
there is evidence of violence or other unusual or suspicious circumstances, the
medical examiner shall be immediately notified, and he or she the medical
examiner shall complete at least the medical items on the report. If a funeral
director is to be involved, the physician licensed health care professional may
delegate to the funeral director the responsibility for completing items other
than those of a medical nature. Similarly, the physician licensed health care
professional may delegate the responsibility for completion of nonmedical
items to appropriate personnel having access to records containing the
information.
(c) If a fetal death occurs on a moving conveyance, the place of occurrence
shall be given as the town or city where removal from the vehicle took place.
(d) Fetal death reports Reports made pursuant to this section are for
statistical purposes only and are not public records. They shall be kept
confidential; shall not be disclosed or discoverable in any civil, criminal,
administrative, or other proceeding; and shall be destroyed after five two years.
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 17 of 25
2025
Sec. 10. 26 V.S.A. § 1354 is amended to read:
§ 1354. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
(a) Prohibited conduct. The Board shall find that any one of the following,
or any combination of the following, whether the conduct at issue was
committed within or outside the State, constitutes unprofessional conduct:
* * *
(2) all advertising of about health care services or a medical business
that is intended or has a tendency to mislead or deceive the public or impose
upon credulous or ignorant persons and so be harmful or injurious to public
morals or safety;
* * *
(21) permitting one’s name or license to be used by a person, group, or
corporation when not actually in charge of, or responsible for, or actively
overseeing the treatment given or other health care services provided;
* * *
(29) delegation of professional responsibilities, including delivery of
any health care services, to a person whom the licensed professional knows, or
has reason to know, is not qualified by training, experience, education, or
licensing credentials to perform them;
* * *
(33)(A) providing, prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing medical
services or prescription medication or prescription-only devices to a person in
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 18 of 25
2025
response to any communication transmitted or received by computer or other
electronic means, when the licensee fails to take the following actions to
establish and maintain a proper physician-patient relationship:
(i) a reasonable effort to verify that the person requesting
medication is in fact the patient, and is in fact who the person claims to be;
(ii) establishment of documented diagnosis through the use of
accepted medical practices; and
(iii) maintenance of a current medical record;
(B) for the purposes of this subdivision (33), an electronic, on-line
online, or telephonic evaluation by questionnaire is inadequate for the initial
evaluation of the patient, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (C)(iv)
of this subdivision (33);
(C) the following would not be in violation of this subdivision (33) if
transmitted or received by computer or other electronic means:
(i) initial admission orders for newly hospitalized patients;
(ii) prescribing for a patient of another physician for whom the
prescriber has taken the call;
(iii) prescribing for a patient examined by a licensed advanced
practice registered nurse, physician assistant, or other advanced practitioner
authorized by law and supported by the physician;
(iv) in furtherance of 18 V.S.A. chapter 223, prescribing
medication for an individual to terminate the individual’s pregnancy based on
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 19 of 25
2025
an adaptive questionnaire developed by or in consultation with health care
providers with clinically appropriate expertise that allows the licensee to obtain
additional medical history and ask follow-up questions as needed;
(v) continuing medication on a short-term basis for a new patient,
prior to the patient’s first appointment; or
(v)(vi) emergency situations where life or health of the patient is
in imminent danger;
* * *
(b) Failure to practice competently. The Board may also find that failure to
practice competently by reason of any cause on a single occasion or on
multiple occasions constitutes unprofessional conduct. Failure to practice
competently includes, as determined by the Board:
(1) performance of unsafe or unacceptable patient care; or
(2) failure to conform to the essential standards of acceptable and
prevailing practice.
(c) Burden of proof. The burden of proof in a disciplinary action shall be
on the State to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the person has
engaged in unprofessional conduct.
(d)(1) Health care providers. Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, no health care provider who is certified, registered, or licensed in
Vermont shall be subject to professional disciplinary action by the Board, nor
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 20 of 25
2025
shall the Board take adverse action on an application for certification,
registration, or licensure of a qualified health care provider, based solely on:
(A)(1) the health care provider providing or assisting in the provision of
legally protected health care activity; or
(B)(2) a criminal, civil, or disciplinary action in another state against the
health care provider that is based solely on the provider providing or assisting
in the provision of legally protected health care activity.
(2)(e) Definitions. As used in this subsection section:
(A)(1) “Health care provider” means a person who provides professional
health care services to an individual during that individual’s medical care,
treatment, or confinement.
(B)(2) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a physical or mental health condition,
including counseling, procedures, products, devices, and medications.
(C)(3) “Legally protected health care activity” has the same meaning as
in 1 V.S.A. § 150.
Sec. 11. 26 V.S.A. § 1615 is amended to read:
§ 1615. ADVANCED PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSES;
REGULATORY AUTHORITY; UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
(a) In addition to the provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 129a and section 1582 of this
chapter, the Board may deny an application for licensure, renewal, or
reinstatement or may revoke, suspend, or otherwise discipline an advanced
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 21 of 25
2025
practice registered nurse upon due notice and opportunity for hearing if the
person engages in the following conduct:
* * *
(6) Providing Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this
section, providing, prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing medical services or
prescription medication or prescription-only devices to a person in response to
any communication transmitted or received by computer or other electronic
means when the licensee fails to take the following actions to establish and
maintain a proper provider-patient relationship:
(A) a reasonable effort to verify that the person requesting
medication is in fact the patient and is in fact who the person claims to be;
(B) establishment of documented diagnosis through the use of
accepted medical practices; and
(C) maintenance of a current medical record.
* * *
(b)(1) For the purposes of subdivision (a)(6) of this section, an electronic,
online, or telephonic evaluation by questionnaire is inadequate for the initial
evaluation of the patient, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2)(D) of
this subsection.
(2) The following would not be in violation of subdivision (a)(6) of this
section:
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 22 of 25
2025
(A) initial admission orders for newly hospitalized patients;
(B) prescribing for a patient of another provider for whom the
prescriber has taken call;
(C) prescribing for a patient examined by a licensed APRN,
physician assistant, or other practitioner authorized by law and supported by
the APRN;
(D) in furtherance of 18 V.S.A. chapter 223, prescribing medication
for an individual to terminate the individual’s pregnancy based on an adaptive
questionnaire developed by or in consultation with health care providers with
clinically appropriate expertise that allows the licensee to obtain additional
medical history and ask follow-up questions as needed;
(E) continuing medication on a short-term basis for a new patient
prior to the patient’s first appointment; or
(E)(F) emergency situations where the life or health of the patient is
in imminent danger.
* * *
Sec. 12. 26 V.S.A. § 1736 is amended to read:
§ 1736. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
(a) The following conduct and the conduct described in section 1354 of this
title by a licensed physician assistant shall constitute unprofessional conduct;
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 23 of 25
2025
when that conduct is by an applicant or person who later becomes an applicant,
it may constitute grounds for denial of licensure:
* * *
(2) occupational advertising or advertising about health care services
that is intended or has a tendency to mislead or deceive the public;
(3) exercising undue influence on or taking improper advantage of a
person using the individual’s services, or promoting the sale of professional
goods or services in a manner that exploits a person for the financial gain of
the practitioner or of a third party;
(4) failing to comply with provisions of federal or state statutes or rules
governing the profession;
(5) conviction of a crime related to the profession; and
(6) conduct that evidences unfitness to practice in the profession.
* * *
(d) As used in this section, “health care services” means services for the
diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a physical or mental health
condition, including counseling, procedures, products, devices, and
medications.
Sec. 13. 26 V.S.A. § 2024 is added to read:
§ 2024. CONFIDENTIALITY OF PRESCRIBER AND PHARMACIST
INFORMATION ON MEDICATIONS FOR LEGALLY
PROTECTED HEALTH CARE ACTIVITY
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 24 of 25
2025
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Gender-affirming health care services” and “reproductive health
care services” have the same meanings as in 1 V.S.A. § 150.
(2) “Noncontrolled medication” means a medication that is not a
controlled substance as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 802.
(b)(1) Upon the request of a prescribing practitioner and to the extent not
expressly required under federal law, a pharmacist or other licensed member of
the pharmacy staff shall redact or otherwise remove the practitioner’s name or
initials from a fulfilled prescription for a noncontrolled medication for gender-
affirming health care services or reproductive health care services, and from
any accompanying printed materials.
(2) A pharmacist may, or, upon the pharmacist’s request, another
licensed member of the pharmacy staff shall, redact or otherwise remove the
pharmacist’s name or initials from a fulfilled prescription for a noncontrolled
medication for gender-affirming health care services or reproductive health
care services, and from any accompanying printed materials.
(3) If a prescribing practitioner dispenses medication directly to patients
for gender-affirming health care services or reproductive health care services,
or both, the practitioner may redact or otherwise remove the practitioner’s own
name or initials from a fulfilled prescription for a noncontrolled medication for
gender-affirming health care services or reproductive health care services, and
from any accompanying printed materials.
VT LEG #383719 v.1

No. 20 Page 25 of 25
2025
(c) Nothing in this chapter or the rules governing the pharmacy profession
shall be construed to require a pharmacist or other licensed member of a
pharmacy’s staff to list the prescribing practitioner’s or pharmacist’s name or
initials on a fulfilled prescription for noncontrolled medication for gender-
affirming health care services or reproductive health care services.
(d) A pharmacist or other licensed member of a pharmacy’s staff shall be
immune from civil and administrative liability for failing to redact or remove
the name of a prescriber or pharmacist when requested to do so pursuant to
subdivision (b)(1) or (2) of this section; provided, however, that this immunity
shall not apply to gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct by
a pharmacist or other licensed member of the pharmacy staff.
Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 13, 2025
VT LEG #383719 v.1